Washington statutes.
RCW 7.77.090

Governmental entity as party.

(1) The disqualification of RCW 7.77.080(1) applies to a collaborative lawyer representing a party that is a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.

(2) After a collaborative law process concludes, another lawyer in a law firm with which the collaborative lawyer is associated may represent a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality in the collaborative matter or a matter related to the collaborative matter if:

(a) The collaborative law participation agreement so provides; and

(b) The collaborative lawyer is isolated from any participation in the collaborative matter or a matter related to the collaborative matter through procedures within the law firm which are reasonably calculated to isolate the collaborative lawyer from such participation.

[ 2013 c 119 s 10.]